Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF139.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1148XS (1) 91 nls/ko S.F. 139 Section 1. Section 15.293A, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 3A. Subject to subsection 3, paragraphs âaâ 3 and âbâ , a grayfield site of more than fifty thousand square 4 feet that is located in a community with a population of less 5 than thirty thousand may be awarded a redevelopment tax credit 6 under this section for a term of two years at the discretion of 7 the board. 8 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 15.339 Nuisance property ââ greater 9 than fifty thousand square feet. 10 1. Subject to section 15.338, the authority may use moneys 11 in the nuisance property remediation fund established in 12 section 15.338, subsection 1, to provide financial assistance 13 not to exceed five hundred thousand dollars to cities for the 14 remediation of nuisance properties, abandoned buildings, and 15 other structures of fifty thousand square feet or more. 16 2. Financial assistance provided pursuant to this section 17 may include loans or forgivable loans and shall be for a 18 minimum term of one hundred twenty months and a maximum term 19 of one hundred eighty months. 20 3. Twenty-five percent of the loan or forgivable loan 21 shall be forgiven upon successful remediation of the nuisance 22 property, abandoned building, or other structure. More 23 than twenty-five percent of the loan or forgivable loan may 24 be forgiven at the discretion of the director. Successful 25 remediation shall be determined by the size of the remediation 26 project, the beginning condition of the nuisance property, 27 abandoned building, or other structure, and if there has a 28 been a meaningful change to the nuisance property, abandoned 29 building, or other structure, including but not limited to the 30 following: 31 a. The nuisance property, abandoned building, or other 32 structure has been cleared or cleaned. 33 b. The nuisance property, abandoned building, or other 34 structure is for sale. 35 -1- LSB 1148XS (1) 91 nls/ko 1/ 4 S.F. 139 c. The nuisance property, abandoned building, or other 1 structure has a proposed reuse plan. 2 d. The nuisance property, abandoned building, or other 3 structure has been repurposed, including but not limited to 4 repurposed for use as a park, housing, or a business. 5 Sec. 3. Section 455E.11, subsection 2, paragraph a, 6 subparagraph (1), subparagraph division (d), Code 2025, is 7 amended to read as follows: 8 (d) Not more than four hundred thousand dollars to the 9 department for purposes of providing funding assistance 10 to eligible communities to address abandoned buildings by 11 promoting waste abatement, diversion, selective dismantlement 12 of building components, and recycling. Eligible communities 13 include a city with a population of five thousand or fewer. 14 Eligible communities also include a city with a population 15 between five thousand and thirty thousand, for which the 16 department may provide funding assistance in an amount equal 17 to ten dollars per square foot of an abandoned building, not 18 to exceed one million dollars. An application for funding 19 assistance may be submitted by any county or municipal 20 government that meets the population requirements of an 21 eligible community, and the abandoned building that is the 22 subject of such application may be owned by any person. 23 Eligible costs for program assistance include but are not 24 limited to asbestos and other hazardous material abatement and 25 removal, the recovery processing of recyclable or reusable 26 material through the selective dismantlement of abandoned 27 buildings, and reimbursement for purchased recycled content 28 materials used in the renovation of buildings. 29